Alabama, session 2026rs, SB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
27 Section 1. Sections 41-9-590, 41-9-594, 41-9-625, and
28 41-9-650, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
Page 1

41-9-650, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
SB118 Enrolled
29 follows:
30 "§41-9-590
31 When used in this article, the following terms shall
32 have the following meanings, respectively, unless the context
33 clearly indicates a different meaning:
34 (1) AJIC or COMMISSION. The Alabama Justice Information
35 Commission.
36 (2) ALEA. The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency.
37 (3) ALEA CJIS. The Criminal Justice Information
38 Services Division of ALEA.
39 (4) BACKGROUND CHECK. A report produced by one or more
40 information systems within ALEA that identifies a specific
41 individual's criminal history record within the state criminal
42 history repository. The report may also include criminal
43 history record information from the national criminal history
44 repository maintained by the FBI or other public
45 safety-related information maintained or accessed through the
46 authority of ALEA.
47 (5) BIOMETRIC DATA. Data derived from analyzing an
48 individual's biometric identifiers.
49 (6) BIOMETRIC IDENTIFIERS. Intrinsic physical or
50 behavioral traits of humans used to uniquely identify or
51 verify an individual's identity from within a population.
52 (7) CIVIL EVENT. A noncriminal, administrative, or
53 legal interaction involving an individual which is recorded
54 alongside his or her biometric data by governmental agencies.
55 (8) CRIMINAL EVENT. A documented interaction between an
56 individual and the criminal justice system. The term includes
Page 2

individual and the criminal justice system. The term includes
SB118 Enrolled
57 information regarding arrests, detentions, indictments, and
58 other formal criminal charges.
59 (9) CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION. Information
60 collected by criminal justice agencies on individuals
61 consisting of identifiable descriptions, including
62 fingerprints and other biometric data, and notations of
63 arrests, detentions, indictments, or other formal charges, and
64 any disposition arising therefrom, including acquittal,
65 sentencing, correctional induction, supervision, or release.
66 The term does not include identification information such as
67 fingerprint records if the information does not indicate the
68 individual's involvement with the criminal justice system.
69 (3)(10) CRIMINAL JUSTICE AGENCIES. Federal, state,
70 local, and tribal public agencies that perform substantial
71 activities or planning for activities relating to the
72 identification, apprehension, prosecution, adjudication, or
73 rehabilitation of civil, traffic, and criminal offenders.
74 (4)(11) CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION. Data necessary
75 for criminal justice Information based upon data under the
76 authority of ALEA or AJIC necessary for criminal justice and
77 public safety agencies to perform their duties and enforce
78 existing law missions. This term includes, but is not limited
79 to, biometrics, business, biometric, identity history, person,
80 organization, and property, when accompanied by any personally
81 identifiable information, bond conditions and provisions, an
82 individual's identity history data, biographic information,
83 case/incident case or incident history reportsdata, and any
84 other data deemed criminal justice information by the FBI CJIS
Page 3

other data deemed criminal justice information by the FBI CJIS
SB118 Enrolled
85 Security Policy. The term also includes ALEA-provided or FBI
86 CJIS-provided data necessary to make hiring decisions. In
87 addition, the term may refer to the ALEA CJIS-provided or FBI
88 CJIS-provided data necessary for civil agencies to perform
89 their missions, including, but not limited to, data used to
90 make hiring decisions.
91 (5)(12) FBI. The Federal Bureau of Investigation.
92 (13) CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION SERVICES DIVISION or
93 FBI CJIS. The division of the Federal Bureau of Investigation
94 that equips law enforcement, national security, and
95 intelligence community partners with needed criminal justice
96 information The Criminal Justice Information Services Division
97 of the FBI that is responsible for the collection,
98 warehousing, and timely dissemination of relevant criminal
99 justice information to the FBI and to qualified law
100 enforcement, criminal justice, civilian, academic, employment,
101 and licensing agencies.
102 (14) IDENTITY HISTORY DATA. Textual data that
103 corresponds with an individual's biometric data, providing a
104 history of criminal and civil events for the identified
105 individual.
106 (6)(15) INFORMATION SYSTEM. A system of people, data,
107 and processes, whether manual or automated, established for
108 the purpose of managing information.
109 (7)(16) NLETS. Network provider The national
110 organization that provides for the exchange of criminal
111 justice and public safety information among multiple between
112 state, federal, and international criminal justice and public
Page 4

state, federal, and international criminal justice and public
SB118 Enrolled
113 safety agencies.
114 (8)(17) NLETS SYSTEM AGENCY or NSA. The state agency
115 responsible for the administration of the NLETS network
116 information provided by NLETS to criminal justice and public
117 safety agencies within this state and who provides a
118 representative from the state for the governance of NLETS.
119 (18) NONCRIMINAL JUSTICE PURPOSE. The uses of criminal
120 history records for purposes authorized by federal or state
121 law other than purposes relating to the administration of
122 criminal justice, including employment suitability, licensing
123 determinations, immigration and naturalization matters, and
124 national security clearances.
125 (9)(19) OFFENSE. Any act that is a felony, misdemeanor,
126 state violation, municipal ordinance violation, or violation,
127 or an act of delinquency.
128 (20) RAP BACK. A system that enables authorized
129 entities to receive ongoing status notifications of any
130 criminal history reported by ALEA or the FBI on individuals
131 whose fingerprints are registered in the ALEA CJIS biometric
132 identity repository or the FBI CJIS national fingerprint file.
133 (10)(21) SECRETARY. The Secretary of the Alabama State
134 Law Enforcement Agency.
135 (22) TEXTUAL DATA. Written or digital records
136 expressing information in written or printed language,
137 including words, sentences, and paragraphs.
138 (11) SBI. The State Bureau of Investigation.
139 (12)(23) USER AGENCY. Any agency or entity that
140 subscribes to, accesses, or views any ALEA information system
Page 5

subscribes to, accesses, or views any ALEA information system
SB118 Enrolled
141 or service provided under the authority of this article."
142 "§41-9-594
143 (a) The commission shall establish its own adopt rules
144 and policies for the performance of the responsibilities
145 charged to it in under this article. Unless otherwise stated,
146 the rules of the commission are subject to the Alabama
147 Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 22 of Title 41. ALEA may
148 establish procedures to implement the rules and policies of
149 the commission or as otherwise stated in state law.
150 (b) The commission shall establish adopt rules and
151 policies that will restrict the information obtained under
152 authority of this article to the items germane to the
153 implementation of this article and restrict the use of
154 information only to authorized persons and agencies.
155 (c) The chair of the commission shall appoint a Privacy
156 and Security Committee from the membership of the commission
157 who are elected officials, or their designees, consisting of a
158 chair and three members, to study the privacy and security
159 implications of sharing criminal justice information and to
160 formulate rule or policy recommendations for consideration by
161 the commission concerning the collection, storage,
162 dissemination, or usage of criminal justice information.
163 (d) The commission may adopt rules and policies
164 regarding the collection, storage, and dissemination of
165 criminal justice information that conform to the policies of
166 the FBI CJIS. The commission may adopt rules and policies that
167 permit ALEA to perform background checks for noncriminal
168 justice purposes and may provide for the procedure for
Page 6

justice purposes and may provide for the procedure for
SB118 Enrolled
169 obtaining the records including, but not limited to, charging
170 a fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for securing
171 records through ALEA. All fees shall be deposited into the
172 State Treasury to the credit of the Public Safety Fund and
173 shall be used to cover the expenses for improving criminal
174 history records and the state repository at ALEA.
175 (e) Any rule or policy of the commission to the
176 contrary notwithstanding, the police department of any college
177 or university in this state which offers medical, nursing, and
178 health care education, or which operates a hospital may
179 request from ALEA a criminal background check on any person
180 who applies for employment with the college or university, and
181 ALEA may charge a background search fee of up to twenty-five
182 dollars ($25) from each applicant for each search conducted on
183 the applicant. All fee proceeds from the background check fee
184 shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the
185 Public Safety Fund and shall be used to cover expenses for
186 improving criminal history records and the state repository at
187 ALEA.
188 (e) The commission may direct ALEA CJIS to establish
189 procedures, manuals, documents, forms or requirements; perform
190 tasks to facilitate federal and state law; and perform tasks
191 to facilitate rules or policies established by the commission.
192 These directives and ALEA CJIS's subsequent response are not
193 subject to APA approval, but must be approved by the
194 commission.
195 (f) The Unless otherwise provided by law, the
196 commission may establish a fee schedule for any services
Page 7

commission may establish a fee schedule for any services
SB118 Enrolled
197 rendered by ALEA under the authority of this article. All fees
198 shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of
199 the Public Safety Fund and shall be used to support, develop,
200 maintain, and promote operations as authorized in this
201 article."
202 "§41-9-625
203 (a) All persons in this state in charge of law
204 enforcement and correctional agencies shall obtain biometric
205 identifiers, which may include fingerprints, photographs, palm
206 prints, retina scans, or other identifiers specified by the
207 FBI, according to the biometric identification system at ALEA
208 and the rules established by the commission of all persons
209 arrested or taken into custody as fugitives from justice, and
210 of all unidentified human corpses in their jurisdictions. All
211 biometric identifiers collected according to this section
212 shall be provided to ALEA according to the rules of the
213 commission.
214 (b) If any person arrested or taken into custody is
215 subsequently released without charge or cleared of the offense
216 through criminal justice proceedings, the disposition shall be
217 reported by all state, county, and municipal criminal justice
218 agencies to ALEA within 30 days of such action, and all of the
219 information shall be eliminated and removed.
220 (a) When an individual is arrested for an offense, the
221 arresting agency shall obtain fingerprints, palm prints, a
222 mugshot, and descriptive information required to establish a
223 criminal history record. The arresting agency may obtain other
224 biometric identifiers, including iris scans; photographs of
Page 8

biometric identifiers, including iris scans; photographs of
SB118 Enrolled
225 scars, marks, or tattoos; and DNA. Any data submitted to ALEA
226 CJIS as required or authorized by this section shall be
227 provided to ALEA according to the commission-approved
228 procedures established by ALEA CJIS for inclusion in the state
229 biometric identification repository.
230 (b) When an individual is detained or taken into
231 custody as a fugitive from justice, the agency with custody
232 over the individual may obtain descriptive information
233 required to establish a criminal history record and biometric
234 identifiers, which may include fingerprints; photographs; palm
235 prints; iris scans; photographs of scars, marks, or tattoos;
236 DNA; or other identifiers specified by AJIC rule. Any data
237 submitted to ALEA CJIS as required or authorized by this
238 subsection shall be provided to ALEA according to the
239 commission-approved procedures established by ALEA CJIS for
240 inclusion in the state biometric identification repository. If
241 the individual is subsequently released without charge,
242 released to the jurisdiction of the underlying arrest, or
243 otherwise cleared of the charged offense through criminal
244 justice proceedings, the involved agency shall notify ALEA
245 CJIS of the disposition within 30 days. Upon receiving
246 notification, ALEA shall remove all information regarding the
247 detainment or custodial event from all ALEA CJIS information
248 systems.
249 (c) All agencies that recover an unidentified human
250 corpse shall obtain biometric identifiers and provide this
251 information and other recovery event-related information to
252 ALEA according to the rules established by the commission and
Page 9

ALEA according to the rules established by the commission and
SB118 Enrolled
253 procedures established by ALEA CJIS for inclusion in the state
254 biometric identification repository.
255 (d) Any AJIS rule specifying other biometric
256 identifiers obtained under subsections (a), (b), or (c), shall
257 be subject to the Alabama Administrative Procedure Act,
258 Chapter 22 of Title 41.
259 (e) A law enforcement officer may use a biometric
260 identification device with access to the state and federal
261 biometric identification repositories to identify an
262 individual to the extent allowed by state law in situations
263 that provide the officer authority to request or otherwise
264 take action to identify an individual. The device must meet
265 FBI or AJIC standards to compare the captured identifier to
266 the state or federal biometric identification repositories.
267 The commission shall establish rules for the use of these
268 devices and the resulting information returned from the use."
269 "§41-9-650
270 In addition to any other requirements, any agency,
271 board, or commission in this state that issues a permit or
272 license, by rule, may require a criminal background check
273 through ALEA as part of its licensing or permitting
274 requirements. Any agency, board, or commission adopting a rule
275 requiring a background check shall be subject to rules and
276 procedures of the commission for the use of the background
277 check.
278 (a) ALEA shall establish and operate a service, to be
279 called the Alabama Background Check Service, that allows
280 authorized persons and entities, pursuant to Section
Page 10

authorized persons and entities, pursuant to Section
SB118 Enrolled
281 41-9-650.1, to obtain background checks on individuals for
282 noncriminal justice purposes.
283 (b)(1) AJIC shall adopt rules for the limited purpose
284 of the operation and use of the Alabama Background Check
285 Service in accordance with this act.
286 (2) ALEA CJIS shall establish procedures that are
287 consistent with the commission's rules.
288 (c) ALEA may contract with one or more vendors or other
289 third-party entities to facilitate any or all functions of the
290 service on behalf of ALEA."
291 Section 2. Sections 41-9-650.1, 41-9-650.2, 41-9-650.3,
292 41-9-650.4, and 41-9-650.5 are added to the Code of Alabama
293 1975, to read as follows:
294 §41-9-650.1
295 (a) For the noncriminal justice purposes specified
296 herein, ALEA may provide a background check to any of the
297 following persons or entities:
298 (1) Any public or private employer to screen a
299 prospective employee or contractor or for other employment
300 purposes.
301 (2) Any government agency, board, or commission with
302 legal authority to issue a license, permit, or certification
303 to screen an applicant for the issuance or renewal of the
304 license, permit, or certification.
305 (3) Any nonprofit or volunteer organization to screen a
306 prospective or current volunteer of the organization.
307 (4) Any housing authority or lessor of rental property
308 to screen a prospective or current resident.
Page 11

to screen a prospective or current resident.
SB118 Enrolled
309 (5) Any educational entity to screen student
310 applicants, prospective or current volunteers involved with
311 entity-related activities, or other individuals directly
312 related to the operations or events of the entity and subject
313 to the entity's authority.
314 (6) Any agency or organization established by federal
315 or state law for an official purpose of the agency or
316 organization.
317 (7) Any person or entity authorized by the rules of the
318 commission to obtain a background check for noncriminal
319 justice purposes.
320 (b) Except as otherwise provided by law, an individual
321 who is the subject of a background check for noncriminal
322 justice purposes shall provide express permission for the
323 release of information to the authorized person or entity
324 requesting the check prior to ALEA's dissemination of
325 background check information. The subject's express permission
326 shall be maintained, physically or digitally, by the
327 requesting person or entity for a period of three years or for
328 the term of the subject's association with the requester,
329 whichever is longer.
330 (c) A background check may not be provided on any
331 individual under 18 years of age without parental consent.
332 (d) Any person or entity that is authorized by state
333 law to perform a background check or allowed by law to adopt
334 rules requiring a background check is subject to the AJIC
335 rules and ALEA procedures described in Section 41-9-650.
336 (e) The commission may require a person or entity to
Page 12

(e) The commission may require a person or entity to
SB118 Enrolled
337 develop background check guidelines for the commission's
338 review and approval prior to allowing the release of
339 background check information to that person or entity.
340 (f) Background check information may only be
341 disseminated for the specific purposes listed in this section.
342 No person or entity that has received background check
343 information from ALEA shall subsequently disseminate the
344 background check information to any other person or entity.
345 (g) Any recipient of a background check record may be
346 subject to an audit by ALEA CJIS.
347 §41-9-650.2
348 (a) The Alabama Background Check Service may be
349 provided through a biometric-based or a name-based search for
350 a background check record.
351 (b) A name-based search shall be initiated by
352 submitting an individual's name to ALEA through an Internet
353 web portal or other commission-approved mechanism, which shall
354 allow for the electronic transfer of records and shall only
355 return state information results.
356 (c) The response to a biometric-based search shall only
357 be provided upon the receipt of biometric information by ALEA
358 or a commission-approved third-party entity acting on behalf
359 of ALEA that meets all FBI standards for biometric
360 identification collection. This search shall provide state
361 information results, as well as other state and federal
362 information as allowed by law.
363 (d) An applicant for a license, permit, or
364 certification shall provide the issuing government agency,
Page 13

certification shall provide the issuing government agency,
SB118 Enrolled
365 board, or commission with his or her name, date of birth,
366 Social Security number, and express permission for the release
367 of information on a form sworn by the applicant. This
368 information shall be digitally provided to ALEA. If a
369 biometric-based check is requested, the applicant shall submit
370 fingerprints or other biometrics in accordance with AJIC rules
371 and ALEA CJIS procedures. If a national record check is
372 required, ALEA shall forward or process the applicant's prints
373 or other biometrics to the FBI for a national criminal
374 background check in a manner consistent with federal law.
375 §41-9-650.3
376 (a) The secretary may establish reasonable record fees
377 for the provision of a background check report, not to exceed
378 thirty dollars ($30). The record fee may be waived at the
379 discretion of the secretary.
380 (b) Additional costs may be assessed to a person or
381 entity requesting a background check for any of the following:
382 (1) The cost for a national criminal background check,
383 as determined by the FBI.
384 (2) Financial transaction fees.
385 (3) A reasonable one-time account registration fee.
386 (c) ALEA may enter into an agreement with one or more
387 vendors or other third-party entities to perform background
388 check services for ALEA on the basis of fee sharing or by
389 adding an additional convenience fee for third-party services.
390 (d) Requests for background checks made by the Alabama
391 Peace Officers' Standards and Training Commission or by any
392 criminal justice agency are exempt from fees established
Page 14

criminal justice agency are exempt from fees established
SB118 Enrolled
393 pursuant to this section if the request is made for criminal
394 justice purposes or for the purpose of making an employment
395 suitability decision.
396 (e) All monies received for background checks shall be
397 deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Public
398 Safety Fund. The monies shall be used for the purposes of ALEA
399 CJIS and for other ALEA expenses as determined by the
400 secretary.
401 §41-9-650.4
402 (a) As part of the Alabama Background Check Service,
403 ALEA may establish the Alabama Rap Back Program. If
404 established, ALEA shall participate in the FBI's Next
405 Generation Identification (NGI) Rap Back Service. The purpose
406 of the rap back service is to allow ALEA to notify
407 participating entities when an enrolled individual is the
408 subject of a rap back notification event, including, but not
409 limited to, being arrested for or convicted of an offense.
410 (b) As used in this section, the following words have
411 the following meanings:
412 (1) INDIVIDUAL. Any individual who has undergone a
413 fingerprint-based background check in order to care for
414 children, the disabled, or the elderly, or to be licensed,
415 certified, or to perform volunteer service, or for any other
416 FBI or federally authorized purpose with a participating
417 entity and who has been enrolled by that participating entity
418 in the Alabama Rap Back Program.
419 (2) PARTICIPATING ENTITY. An entity with statutory
420 authority to require an individual to undergo a
Page 15

authority to require an individual to undergo a
SB118 Enrolled
421 fingerprint-based background check as a condition to care for
422 children, the disabled, or the elderly, or to be licensed,
423 certified, or to perform volunteer service, or for any other
424 FBI or federally authorized purpose and has elected to enroll
425 those individuals in the Alabama Rap Back Program.
426 (c) ALEA may submit fingerprints and accompanying
427 records to the FBI to be retained in and advised through the
428 FBI's NGI Rap Back Service when an enrolled individual is
429 arrested for or convicted of a criminal offense. Fingerprints
430 submitted to the FBI may be used for future searches,
431 including latent searches.
432 (d) ALEA shall ensure that notification is made to the
433 participating entity that enrolls an individual in the Alabama
434 Rap Back Program when an FBI Rap Back report notification is
435 received. The information contained in the notification shall
436 be used by the participating entity for purposes of
437 determining the eligibility of the continued service of the
438 individual and shall not be further disseminated.
439 (e) ALEA shall adopt rules governing the operation and
440 maintenance of the Alabama Rap Back Program and the removal
441 and destruction of records on individuals who are deceased or
442 who are no longer individuals as defined in this section. Such
443 rules shall provide that a participating entity shall
444 disenroll any individual who is deceased or is no longer an
445 individual as defined in this section within five business
446 days of death or such event that no longer requires the
447 individual to be enrolled in the Alabama Rap Back Program to
448 ensure the prompt removal and destruction of records from the
Page 16

ensure the prompt removal and destruction of records from the
SB118 Enrolled
449 Alabama Rap Back Program.
450 (f) ALEA may assess an annual fee not to exceed twelve
451 dollars ($12) per individual enrolled in the Alabama Rap Back
452 Program. The fee shall be paid by the participating entity
453 enrolling an individual in the Alabama Rap Back Program. When
454 more than one participating entity enrolls the same individual
455 in the Alabama Rap Back Program, both participating entities
456 shall be responsible for paying the full cost for maintenance
457 and notification. Any fees collected shall be deposited in the
458 State Treasury to the credit of the Public Safety Fund. Such
459 monies shall be used for the purposes of ALEA CJIS and for
460 other ALEA expenses as determined by the secretary.
461 (g) No participating entity authorized to submit
462 fingerprints shall be considered negligent per se in a civil
463 action solely because the entity elected not to enroll an
464 individual in the Alabama Rap Back Program pursuant to this
465 section.
466 (h) Prior to enrolling an applicant in the Alabama Rap
467 Back Program, a participating entity shall ensure the
468 applicant receives notice and access to documentation
469 informing the applicant that his or her fingerprints shall be
470 retained for the purpose of providing the participating entity
471 notification of any subsequent modifications to the
472 applicant's criminal history record.
473 (i) ALEA may establish an in-state rap back service for
474 any person or entity that does not qualify to receive
475 information from the FBI Rap Back service but that has
476 authority to require a state-only background check.
Page 17

authority to require a state-only background check.
SB118 Enrolled
477 §41-9-650.5
478 (a) An individual commits the crime of misuse of a
479 background check report if he or she does any of the
480 following:
481 (1) Knowingly receives, disseminates, or otherwise uses
482 a background check contrary to the purposes allowed by this
483 article or otherwise allowed in law.
484 (2) Performs a background check on an individual
485 without first receiving a release, when required, from the
486 subject of the report.
487 (3) Willfully uses information submitted to the Alabama
488 Rap Back Program for purposes not authorized in this article
489 with the intent to harass or intimidate another individual.
490 (b) Misuse of a background check report is a Class B
491 misdemeanor.
492 (c) Upon conviction for any violation of this section,
493 the defendant may be ordered to pay restitution to the victim
494 whose information was misused. Restitution shall include any
495 pecuniary damages or loss to the victim ordered pursuant to a
496 hearing held as provided in Section 15-18-67.
497 Section 3. Article 4 of Chapter 2 of Title 32, Code of
498 Alabama 1975, relating to the release of criminal history
499 information, is repealed.
500 Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
501 1, 2026.
Page 18

1, 2026.
SB118 Enrolled
502
503
504
505
506
507
508 ________________________________________________
509 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
510
511
512
513 ________________________________________________
514 Speaker of the House of Representatives
515
516
517 SB118
518 Senate 03-Feb-26
519 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
520 the Senate, as amended.
521
522 Patrick Harris,
523 Secretary.
524
525
526
527
528 House of Representatives
529 Amended and passed: 17-Mar-26
530
531
532
533
534 Senate concurred in House amendment 01-Apr-26
535
536
537
538
539 By: Senator Bell
Page 19